Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX c Y 76
SFX c um      um              um        
SFX c um      i               um        
SFX c um      o               um        
SFX c um      a               um        
SFX c um      orum            um        
SFX c um      is              um        
SFX c 0       que             um        
SFX c 0       ne              um        
SFX c 0       ve              um        
SFX c um      ique            um        
SFX c um      ine             um        
SFX c um      ive             um        
SFX c um      oque            um        
SFX c um      one             um        
SFX c um      ove             um        
SFX c um      aque            um        
SFX c um      ane             um        
SFX c um      ave             um        
SFX c um      orumque         um        
SFX c um      orumne          um        
SFX c um      orumve          um        
SFX c um      isque           um        
SFX c um      isne            um        
SFX c um      isve            um        
SFX c us      us              us        
SFX c us      i               us        
SFX c us      o               us        
SFX c us      a               us        
SFX c us      orum            us        
SFX c us      is              us        
SFX c us      um              us        
SFX c 0       que             us        
SFX c 0       ne              us        
SFX c 0       ve              us        
SFX c us      ique            us        
SFX c us      ine             us        
SFX c us      ive             us        
SFX c us      oque            us        
SFX c us      one             us        
SFX c us      ove             us        
SFX c us      aque            us        
SFX c us      ane             us        
SFX c us      ave             us        
SFX c us      orumque         us        
SFX c us      orumne          us        
SFX c us      orumve          us        
SFX c us      isque           us        
SFX c us      isne            us        
SFX c us      isve            us        
SFX c us      umque           us        
SFX c us      umne            us        
SFX c us      umve            us        
SFX c i       i               i         
SFX c i       o               i         
SFX c i       a               i         
SFX c i       orum            i         
SFX c i       is              i         
SFX c i       um              i         
SFX c 0       que             i         
SFX c 0       ne              i         
SFX c 0       ve              i         
SFX c i       oque            i         
SFX c i       one             i         
SFX c i       ove             i         
SFX c i       aque            i         
SFX c i       ane             i         
SFX c i       ave             i         
SFX c i       orumque         i         
SFX c i       orumne          i         
SFX c i       orumve          i         
SFX c i       isque           i         
SFX c i       isne            i         
SFX c i       isve            i         
SFX c i       umque           i         
SFX c i       umne            i         
SFX c i       umve            i         

SFX b Y 84
SFX b us      us              us        
SFX b us      e               us        
SFX b us      um              us        
SFX b us      i               us        
SFX b us      o               us        
SFX b us      os              us        
SFX b us      orum            us        
SFX b us      is              us        
SFX b 0       que             us        
SFX b 0       ne              us        
SFX b 0       ve              us        
SFX b us      eque            us        
SFX b us      ene             us        
SFX b us      eve             us        
SFX b us      umque           us        
SFX b us      umne            us        
SFX b us      umve            us        
SFX b us      ique            us        
SFX b us      ine             us        
SFX b us      ive             us        
SFX b us      oque            us        
SFX b us      one             us        
SFX b us      ove             us        
SFX b us      osque           us        
SFX b us      osne            us        
SFX b us      osve            us        
SFX b us      orumque         us        
SFX b us      orumne          us        
SFX b us      orumve          us        
SFX b us      isque           us        
SFX b us      isne            us        
SFX b us      isve            us        
SFX b i       i               i         
SFX b i       um              i         
SFX b i       o               i         
SFX b i       os              i         
SFX b i       orum            i         
SFX b i       is              i         
SFX b 0       que             i         
SFX b 0       ne              i         
SFX b 0       ve              i         
SFX b i       umque           i         
SFX b i       umne            i         
SFX b i       umve            i         
SFX b i       oque            i         
SFX b i       one             i         
SFX b i       ove             i         
SFX b i       osque           i         
SFX b i       osne            i         
SFX b i       osve            i         
SFX b i       orumque         i         
SFX b i       orumne          i         
SFX b i       orumve          i         
SFX b i       isque           i         
SFX b i       isne            i         
SFX b i       isve            i         
SFX b r       r               r         
SFX b 0       um              r         
SFX b 0       i               r         
SFX b 0       o               r         
SFX b 0       os              r         
SFX b 0       orum            r         
SFX b 0       is              r         
SFX b 0       que             r         
SFX b 0       ne              r         
SFX b 0       ve              r         
SFX b 0       umque           r         
SFX b 0       umne            r         
SFX b 0       umve            r         
SFX b 0       ique            r         
SFX b 0       ine             r         
SFX b 0       ive             r         
SFX b 0       oque            r         
SFX b 0       one             r         
SFX b 0       ove             r         
SFX b 0       osque           r         
SFX b 0       osne            r         
SFX b 0       osve            r         
SFX b 0       orumque         r         
SFX b 0       orumne          r         
SFX b 0       orumve          r         
SFX b 0       isque           r         
SFX b 0       isne            r         
SFX b 0       isve            r         
