Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
acervus/b
Actiacus/abc
adfectus/abc
adiectivus/abc
adoreus/abc
adsiduus/abc
adversarius/abc
adversus/abc
aemulus/abc
aeneus/abc
aerarium/c
aerius/abc
aeternus/abc
aetherius/abc
afflictus/abc
Africus/abc
aheneus/abc
aiumentum/c
Alceus/b
alipilus/b
aliquantum/c
alvus/b
amantissimus/abc
amblygonius/abc
Amerinus/abc
Anaximandri/b
ancillariolus/abc
angiportus/b
Annaeus/b
annuus/abc
Anteius/b
anteriorandus/abc
Antius/b
apparatissimus/abc
Appianus/abc
Apronius/b
araneus/b
aratrum/c
archimedeus/abc
arenarius/abc
argenteus/abc
Aristarchus/b
armamentum/c
Arminius/b
Aruernus/b
arvum/c
Asinius/b
assum/c
astrologus/b
atlanticus/abc
attonitus/abc
Attus/b
augurium/c
augustus/abc
autenticus/abc
autumnus/b
avitus/abc
avunculus/b
baculus/b
balneum/c
basiliscus/b
bellicosus/abc
bellus/abc
bibulus/abc
bifer/abc
binarius/abc
blandus/abc
boetianus/abc
bonus/abc
breviculus/abc
Bructerus/b
caducus/abc
caeruleus/abc
calamitosus/abc
calefaciendus/abcq
Callistratus/b
cancellatus/abc
candidus/abc
cantabundus/abc
Capitolinus/abc
captatorius/abc
carnarium/c
carus/abc
Catamitus/b
catenarius/abc
Catullus/b
Cavarinus/b
celebratissimus/abc
Centaurus/b
centrum/c
Cerberus/b
chai/b
Chalcidicus/abc
Christianus/abc
cilium/c
Cimbricus/abc
circumferendus/abc
circumscriptus/abc
citimus/abc
citrosus/abc
clamosus/abc
claudus/abc
clavulus/b
Cluvius/b
coccinus/abc
codicillus/b
Colchus/abc
comatus/abc
commeritus/abc
compactus/abc
completus/abc
concitus/abc
concreatus/abc
confragosus/abc
connubium/c
consentaneus/abc
consortium/c
contagium/c
contionabundus/abc
contrarius/abc
convitium/c
corneus/abc
corniculatus/abc
cosmicus/abc
cretaceus/abc
croceus/abc
cubicus/abc
cubitus/b
curatius/abc
Curiatius/b
Cythereus/abc
daedalus/abc
decagonus/abc
decuplus/abc
deditus/abc
deletus/abc
demptus/abc
denominativus/abc
destructivus/abc
dialecticus/abc
diametri/b
diffutatus/abc
discus/b
disertus/abc
distributivus/abc
Diviciacus/b
divisus/abc
domesticus/abc
Dorotheus/b
draconteus/abc
dulcisonus/abc
duodevicesimus/abc
duodevigintuplus/abc
ecclesiasticus/abc
efferus/abc
effrenatus/abc
ellipticus/abc
entheus/abc
ephippium/c
ethicus/abc
Etruscus/abc
excitus/abc
exhibitorius/abc
exilium/c
expectatus/abc
extraordinarius/abc
extrinsecus/abc
facinerosus/abc
famulus/b
farreum/c
fatuus/abc
femininus/abc
ferendus/abc
fescenninus/abc
Firmicus/b
firmissimus/abc
Florentinus/abc
focus/b
folium/c
forum/c
fraternus/abc
frivolus/abc
fulcimentum/c
fumus/b
furibundus/abc
gaiolus/abc
gallicinium/c
geminus/abc
generosus/abc
gladius/b
gloriosus/abc
graculus/b
gratuitus/abc
gymnicus/abc
harmonicus/abc
Hellespontiacus/abc
hexagonicus/abc
hexahedrus/abc
hiulcus/abc
homicidium/c
hospitus/abc
humillimus/abc
hypomixolydius/abc
Idaeus/abc
idoneus/abc
immaturus/abc
immutatus/abc
imperterritus/abc
impunitus/abc
inanimatus/abc
inclytus/abc
incommodus/abc
incorruptus/abc
incruentus/abc
indicativus/abc
indignus/abc
inerrativus/abc
inerratus/abc
infinitus/abc
infirmus/abc
iniussus/abc
iniustus/abc
inquietus/abc
inreligiosus/abc
insperatus/abc
insuetus/abc
interiturus/abc
internuntius/b
intrinsecus/abc
inusitatus/abc
iocosus/abc
iratus/abc
Ithacus/abc
Iudaeus/abc
Iunius/abc
kathetus/b
laetus/abc
lanius/b
laterus/abc
latinus/abc
Lemannus/b
lenocinium/c
Libyssus/abc
lignarius/abc
Livius/b
Lollianus/abc
Lucrinus/abc
Ludius/abc
Lusitanus/b
maenianum/c
magistri/b
malevolus/abc
Mamercus/b
Marcius/b
marinus/abc
mathematicus/abc
mechanicus/abc
mellitus/abc
mendosus/abc
merus/abc
miliadicum/c
millenus/abc
misellus/abc
mitificus/abc
monasterium/c
monstruosus/abc
mortuus/abc
multinodus/abc
musicus/abc
mutilus/abc
Nautius/abc
nefandus/abc
nervus/b
Niliacus/abc
niveus/abc
nonnullus/abc
noscitabundus/abc
nudus/abc
numerus/b
obstipus/abc
occupatus/abc
octogonus/abc
octuplus/abc
oleum/c
onustus/abc
oportunus/abc
opulentus/abc
orcinianus/abc
orthogonus/abc
otium/c
Palumbus/b
panarium/c
pardus/b
parvus/abc
patrius/abc
peculium/c
pendulus/abc
percarus/abc
pergamus/b
periturus/abc
permodestus/abc
pertaesus/abc
pessimus/abc
physicus/abc
Pilatus/b
placidissimus/abc
placidus/abc
Plutarchus/b
Plutonius/abc
pomarius/abc
porus/b
posterus/abc
praecipitium/c
praecisus/abc
praegravidus/abc
praenuntius/abc
praesagium/c
prasinus/abc
precarius/abc
priscus/abc
privatus/abc
proditurus/abc
profugus/abc
promissus/abc
prooemium/c
ptolemaicus/abc
Ptolemeus/b
pupulus/b
pustulatus/abc
quadragenus/abc
quadrinomium/c
querceus/abc
quindecimus/abc
Quirinius/b
ratus/Sabc
recurvus/abc
relictus/abc
reliquus/abc
resupinus/abc
Rhenus/b
roseus/abc
rugosus/abc
sacculus/b
sacrum/c
salvus/APSabc
Samius/abc
saxeus/abc
scaenicus/abc
scruposus/abc
Scythicus/abc
sellularius/abc
semermus/abc
senarius/abc
senectus/abcq
sericus/abc
serius/abc
sesquiquartus/abc
sextuplus/abc
Sibyllinus/abc
simulacrum/c
singularius/abc
solitum/Sc
somnus/b
spatium/c
spontaneus/abc
squamosus/abc
stolidus/abc
stratum/Sc
subcontrarius/abc
subflavus/abc
subsidiarius/abc
substantivus/abc
summum/c
summus/abc
supprapositus/abc
supremus/abc
syracusanus/abc
Syrus/abc
tantus/abc
Tatius/b
tentorium/c
tepidus/abc
tetragonus/abc
Thessalicus/abc
thyrsiger/abc
timendus/abc
torridus/abc
torvus/abc
transversarius/abc
Trebellenus/b
tricensimus/abc
trigecuplus/abc
tristiculus/abc
tropicus/abc
Turranius/b
turrutus/abc
umerus/b
unetuicesimus/abc
unus/abcq
vacuus/abc
vagus/abc
velabrum/c
venatorius/abc
verbum/c
versiculus/b
vexillum/c
Vibius/b
vinum/c
violentus/abc
volgatus/abc
Zephyrus/b
semustus/abcP
Vibullius/b
